Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-913
Medical assistance program; public awareness; public school district; hospital; duties.

(1) Each public school district shall annually, at the beginning of the school year, provide written information supplied by the department to every student describing the availability of children's health services provided under the medical assistance program.

(2) Each hospital shall provide the mother of every child born in such hospital, at the time of such birth, written information provided by the department describing the availability of children's health services provided under the medical assistance program.

(3) The department shall develop and implement other activities designed to increase public awareness of the availability of children's health services provided under the medical assistance program. Such activities shall include materials and efforts designed to increase participation in the program by minority populations.

Laws 1998, LB 1063, § 10;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 68-1025.01;

Laws 2006, LB 1248, § 13;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 248.